Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB109.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3 of the act of November 26, 1978 (P.L.1375, No.325), known as the Dam Safety and Encroachments Act, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Groin structure." A shore structure that may affect shore erosion, wave action or inundation.* * *123456789101112131415161718192021 Section 2. Section 15 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 15. Projects affecting submerged lands of the Commonwealth.* * *(f) The department may charge a license fee not to exceed $250 for a person to construct, repair, replace, operate, maintain or remove a groin structure at the licensed premises.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0109PN0062 - 2 - 123456789